Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Revision of title. —

Sections 1 through 4, ch. 62, Laws 1982, revised this title and Titles 16 and 25. Section 1, ch. 62, Laws 1982, renumbered §§ 9-1-127, 9-3-803 through 9-3-806, and 9-7-203 as §§

1-35-108

, 7-13-401(b) through (e), and

28-1-114

, respectively, and renumbered other sections formerly in Titles 16 and 25. Section 2, ch. 62, Laws 1982, amended and renumbered §§ 9-7-202 and

9-16-101

through 9-16-107 as §§

28-1-113

and 6-6-401 through 6-6-407, respectively. Section 3, ch. 62, Laws 1982, amended and renumbered the balance of §§

9-1-101

through 9-21-103,

25-2-101

through 25-4-105, and

35-13-101

through 35-13-104 as §§

9-1-101

through

9-8-302

,

16-1-101

through

16-7-121

, and

25-1-101

through

25-10-305

. Section 4, ch. 62, Laws 1982, repealed numerous sections formerly contained in Titles 9, 25 and 35. No detailed comparison of changes made by the 1982 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they will be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.